Tennessee, session 114, HB1692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-116(a)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "provided, that the court may waive this requirement when the child is to
be adopted by related persons" and substituting:
provided, that the court may waive this requirement when the child is to be adopted by
related persons or the child has already resided in the home of the petitioners for six (6)
months
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-116(e)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "for prospective adoptive parents who are related to the child" and
substituting:
for prospective adoptive parents who are related to the child or in whose home the child
has already resided for six (6) months
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-119(a), is amended by deleting
the language "Unless the child is related to the petitioners" and substituting the language
"Unless the child is related to the petitioners or has already resided in the home of the
petitioners for six (6) months".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-119(c), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) If the child has already resided in the home of the petitioners for six (6)
months, the court has received the final court report concerning the circumstances of the
child and the petitioners, and the court is satisfied that the adoption will be in the best
HB1692
010250
- 1 -

interest of the child, then the court may waive the preliminary home study, home study,
and six-month waiting period after the filing of the adoption petition and may enter an
order of adoption.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010250